District of Columbia statutes.
47-213

Preparation and submission of expense estimates for government of District.

The estimates for expenses of the government of the District of Columbia shall be prepared and submitted each year according to the order and arrangement of the appropriation act for the year preceding, and any change in such order and arrangement and transfers of salaries from 1 office or department to another desired by the Mayor may be submitted by note in the estimates.

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 616, ch. 1352, § 4
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-213.
1973 Ed., § 47-211.